New Jersey, session 222, A2978.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   Any order, rule, or regulation issued by the Governor pursuant to P.L.1942, c.251 (C.App.A:9-33 et seq.) shall terminate on the 31st day after issuance, unless approved for a greater period by the Legislature pursuant to a concurrent resolution receiving the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the authorized membership of each House. The Governor shall not issue, for the same emergency, an order, rule, or regulation to the same or substantially same effect as one terminated pursuant to this subsection. b.    This section shall not apply to any order, rule, or regulation: (1)   rescinding an order, rule, or regulation issued pursuant to P.L.1942, c.251 (C.App.A:9-33 et seq.); (2)   issued pursuant to direction by or agreement with the federal government, in compliance with federal law, or such that application of this section would jeopardize the receipt of federal funds by this State; (3)   applying exclusively to any or all of the executive and administrative offices, departments, and instrumentalities of the State government; (4)   issued under the authority of the Governor as the Commander-in-Chief of all the military and naval forces of the State; or (5)   issued pursuant to any other provision of law providing for a greater period, notwithstanding that such order, rule, or regulation invokes any authority under the provisions of P.L.1942, c.251 (C.App.A:9-33 et seq.). 2.    This act shall take effect on January 1, 2021.